Utah statutes.
16-10a-707.   Record date.

(1)  The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing the record date for one or more voting groups in order to determine the shareholders entitled to be given notice of a shareholders' meeting, to determine shareholders entitled to take action without a meeting, to demand a special meeting, to vote, or to take any other action.  If the bylaws do not fix or provide for the manner of fixing a record date, the board of directors of the corporation may fix a future date as the record date.

(2)  If not otherwise fixed under Section 16-10a-703 or Subsection (1), the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at an annual or special shareholders' meeting is the close of business on the day before the first notice is delivered to shareholders.

(3)  A record date fixed under this section may not be more than 70 days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of shareholders.

(4)  A determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a shareholders' meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, which it shall do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

(5)  If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date continues in effect or it may fix a new record date.

